Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202012-808
Abandoned or neglected
pioneer cemetery, defined.

For purposes of sections
12-807 to 12-810 and 12-812,
an abandoned or neglected pioneer cemetery shall be defined according to the
following criteria:

(1) Such cemetery was founded or the land upon which such
cemetery is situated was given, granted, donated, sold, or deeded to the founders
of the cemetery prior to January 1, 1900;

(2) Such cemetery contains the grave or graves of a person
or persons who were homesteaders, immigrants from a foreign nation, prairie
farmers, pioneers, sodbusters, first generation Nebraskans, or Civil War veterans;
and

(3) Such cemetery has been generally abandoned or neglected
for a period of at least five consecutive years.

Laws 1975, LB 129, § 2;

Laws 1996, LB 932, § 1;

Laws 2008, LB995, § 6;

Laws 2014, LB863, § 11.